http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7451286.html House rejects 9-month withdrawal for troops, agrees to guarantee funds only through July rejects 9-month withdrawal for troops, agrees to guarantee funds only through July House Speaker Nancy Pelosi of Calif., second from left, accompanied by fellow House Democratic leaders, talks to reporters on Capitol Hill in Washington, Thursday, May 10, 2007, after a closed-door meeting to discuss Iraq war legislation. From left are, House Majority Whip James Clyburn of S.C., Pelosi, House Democratic Caucus Chairman Rep. Rahm Emanuel, D-Ill. and House Majority Leader Steny Hoyer of Md. 2007 at 5:29 PM 2007 at 5:29 PM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - The Democratic-controlled House voted Thursday night to pay for military operations in Iraq on an installment plan, defying President Bush's threat of a second straight veto in a fierce test of wills over the unpopular war. The 221-205 vote, largely along party lines, sent the measure to a cool reception in the Senate, where Majority Leader Harry Reid, D-Nev., is seeking compromise with the White House and Republicans on a funding bill. Under increasing political pressure from Republicans, Bush also signalled flexibility, offering to accept a spending bill that sets out standards for the Iraqi government to meet. "Time's running out, because the longer we wait the more strain we're going to put on the military," said the president, who previously had insisted on what he termed a "clean" war funding bill. Bush and key lawmakers have stepped up expressions of frustration with the government in Baghdad in recent weeks, and Iraqi Deputy Prime Minister Barham Saleh spent his day in a series of meetings with key senators appealing for patience. In a brief interview with The Associated Press, Saleh said the purpose of the meetings was to convey the "imperative of success against terrorism and extremism" in the Middle East. Despite Bush's ability to sustain his vetoes in Congress - the House upheld his rejection of a troop withdrawal timetable last week - Democrats called for votes on two separate bills Thursday that challenged him on the war. "Democrats are not going to give the president a blank check for a war without end," vowed House Speaker Nancy Pelosi of California. The first measure would have required the withdrawal of U.S. combat forces from Iraq within nine months. It fell, 255-171, with 59 Democrats joining almost all Republicans in opposition. "This war is a terrible tragedy and it is time to bring it to an end," said Rep. James McGovern, leading advocate of the bill to establish a nine-month withdrawal timetable. "For four long, deadly years, this administration and their allies in Congress have been flat wrong about Iraq," said the Massachusetts Democrat. Republicans argued that a withdrawal would be disastrous. "Now is not the time to signal retreat and surrender. How could this Congress walk away from our men and women in uniform," said Rep. Jerry Lewis, R-Calif. A few hours later, the House passed legislation providing funds for the war grudgingly, in two installments. The first portion would cover costs until Aug. 1 - $42.8 billion to buy equipment and train Iraqi and Afghan security forces. Under the bill, it would take a summertime vote by Congress to free an additional $52.8 billion, the money needed to cover costs through the Sept. 30 end of the fiscal year. "We reject that idea. It won't work," the president declared after a meeting with military leaders at the Pentagon. Democratic officials, speaking privately, said Pelosi had agreed to allow the vote on the withdrawal measure in the hope that her rank-and-file would then unite behind the funding bill. But in an increasingly complex political environment, even that measure was deemed to be dead on arrival in the Senate, where Democrats hold a narrow advantage and the rules give Republicans leverage to block legislation. Senate Majority Leader Harry Reid, D-Nev., has met privately in recent days with White House Chief of Staff Josh Bolten and Senate Minority Leader Mitch McConnell, R-Ky., the beginning of talks aimed at producing a compromise funding bill that Bush would sign. In a speech in January, Bush listed several goals for the Iraqis, including legislation to share oil revenue among all Iraqis, spending $10 billion on job-creating reconstruction projects, holding provincial elections, overhauling de-Baathification laws and creating a fair process for considering amendments to the constitution. But in contrast to many lawmakers, the administration has not yet publicly accepted proposals to make future reconstruction funds conditional on Baghdad's progress in achieving the goals. Bush and the Democratic leaders were maneuvering in a complicated political environment. Republican lawmakers have grown increasingly restive about a war that they believe cost them their congressional majorities in last fall's elections. In a private meeting with Bush and several key administration officials at the White House, 11 moderate GOP lawmakers bluntly told Bush that the status quo was unsustainable and could mean further election losses next year. But Pelosi and Reid face obstacles of their own. They are determined to make sure that essential funding for the war is not cut off. At the same time, they are laboring to keep faith with their own rank-and-file, with the war-weary voters who installed them in power, and with MoveOn.org and other groups whose overriding goal is to force the withdrawal of the U.S. combat troops. MoveOn.org, in particular, has played a key behind-the-scenes role in the months since Congress convened under Democratic majorities. The group, which played a highly visible role in last year's election campaign, acquiesced in an early Democratic strategy of seeking approval for nonbinding measures to pressure Bush to change his plans. In recent weeks, that has changed. Fearing that Democrats ultimately will surrender and give Bush the money he wants, the organization sent Reid and Pelosi a letter saying that if Democrats "appear to capitulate to Bush on Iraq, MoveOn will move to a position of opposition." killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7460487.html Hundreds flee wildfire on resort island off California coast flee wildfire on resort island off California coast AM PDT AVALON, Calif. (AP) - Firefighters struggled early Friday to protect a resort island's main city from a wildfire that forced hundreds of residents to flee on ferries as ash rained down like snow. One home and a few small businesses in the canyons outside the city burned, but the weather helped firefighters keep most properties safe, Fire Chief Steven Hoefs said. Some 1,200 homes were under voluntary or mandatory evacuation orders. "The risk has been reduced significantly," Hoefs said. "Most of the structures have been protected." The blaze broke out Thursday afternoon and grew to 4,000 acres as it fed on dry brush, fanned by a steady wind into the night on the island about 30 miles off the Southern California mainland. The orange inferno loomed behind the quaint crescent harbor, landmark 1929 Catalina Casino and homes, restaurants and tiny hotels clinging to slopes above the waterfront. As flames threatened the city limits of Avalon, hundreds of people lined up at the harbor Thursday night to board ferries to the mainland. Many covered their faces with towels and bandanas as ashes fell. Resident Kathy Troeger fled with her three children and a friend's daughter, while her husband, a fire captain, stayed behind to fight the blaze. "It was like a nightmare when we left," she said after arriving at the mainland port of Long Beach. "You couldn't breathe, and ash was falling like snow." At least 160 firefighters, aided by four water-dropping helicopters and three retardant-dropping air tankers, battled flames through most of Thursday. The helicopters flew into the night and were expected to be back in the air at dawn Friday. Dozens of fire engines arrived through the night from as far away as Fresno, carried by giant military hovercraft from the Marine Corps' Camp Pendleton. Wind calmed during the night and the air grew moist, although the threat remained. About 175 homes and businesses lost electricity when power poles caught on fire. In Avalon, authorities used a bullhorn to urge people to evacuate and head to the beach. Visitors were directed to the historic art deco Casino until it lost power, while residents were sent to another harbor site. The Catalina Express ferry service added night departures of 400-passenger vessels. A family of eight said they had just enough time to pack some clothes and personal papers before fleeing. "I'm scared," said Angelica Romero, 30, holding her 7-month-old daughter. "But what's important is I have my children. The rest doesn't matter." About 85 people checked into an evacuation center set up at a high school, the Red Cross said. Despite being well offshore, Catalina has been left parched by the lack of rainfall that has made the rest of Southern California particularly susceptible to wildfires like the one in Los Angeles' Griffith Park this week. Firefighters were still working Friday to surround what remained of that fire, which briefly chased people from homes and threatened the park's landmark observatory and zoo. Officials had expected the blaze to be fully contained by Thursday, two days after it peaked, but fire crews were still building containment lines around the fire's perimeter late into the night, though no visible flames remained. Catalina has gotten only 2 inches of rain since January. A long, narrow island, Catalina covers 76 square miles and is served by helicopters and ferry boats from Los Angeles, Long Beach and other mainland harbors. Avalon has a population of 3,200 that swells to more than 10,000 on weekends and in summer, according to the Catalina Island Chamber of Commerce and Visitors Bureau. Most the island is owned by the Santa Catalina Island Conservancy and is home to various wildlife. killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7460372.html Poll: Public gives both Congress, Bush low approval ratings Public gives both Congress, Bush low approval ratings President Bush addresses the Republican National Committee Gala at the DC Armory Thursday, May 10, 2007 in Washington. AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - People think the Democratic-led Congress is doing just as dreary a job as President Bush, following four months of bitter political standoffs that have seen little progress on Iraq and a host of domestic issues. An AP-Ipsos poll also found that House Speaker Nancy Pelosi is a more popular figure than the president and her colleagues on Capitol Hill, though she faces a gender gap in which significantly more women than men support her. The survey found only 35 percent approve of how Congress is handling its job, down 5 percentage points in a month. That gives lawmakers the same bleak approval rating as Bush, who has been mired at about that level since last fall, including his dip to a record low for the AP-Ipsos poll of 32 percent last January. "It's mostly Iraq" plus a lack of progress in other areas, said Rep. Tom Cole, R-Okla., who heads the House GOP's campaign committee. "These are not good numbers for an incumbent, and it doesn't matter if you have an 'R' or a 'D' next to your name." Democrats agree that the problem is largely Iraq, which has dominated this year's session of Congress while producing little more than this month's Bush veto of a bill requiring the withdrawal of U.S. troops. It has also overshadowed House-passed bills on stem cell research, student loans and other subjects that the White House opposes, they say. "People are unhappy, there hasn't been a lot of change in direction, for example in Iraq," said Rep. Chris Van Hollen, D-Md., chairman of House Democrats' campaign effort. Rising gasoline prices could also be a factor, lawmakers said. In another measure of popular discontent, the survey found that 71 percent say the country is on the wrong track - about even with the 73 percent who said so last May, the worst level since the AP-Ipsos poll began in December 2003. The survey was taken Monday through Wednesday, before Bush offered to seek compromise with congressional Democrats over a war spending bill setting benchmarks for progress in Iraq. Bush told reporters Thursday that if pollsters had asked his opinion about Iraq last fall, "I'd have said I disapprove of what was going on in Iraq. They could have put me down as part of the disapproval process." That was before his decision to send nearly 30,000 additional troops to Iraq, which "would more likely cause me to approve of what's going on in Iraq," he added. Overall approval of Bush was steady from last month, but fell to 69 percent among Republicans, about 7 percentage points below where it had been in April. Earlier this week, a group of GOP moderate House members warned Bush that the status quo in Iraq could mean Republican election losses next year. "If the war doesn't begin to turn around, Republicans will have problems," said Rep. Peter King, R-N.Y., who said he supports Bush's Iraq policy. White House spokesman Tony Snow declined to comment on the poll. Congress' approval rating this week was 10 points higher than a year ago, when Republicans were in control. But after bumping up in April, this month's drop left lawmakers' job approval where it was when the year began. April saw Congress defy Bush and send him a bill financing the war and requiring a troop withdrawal, which he vetoed May 1. "People wanted change in Washington" on many issues, not just Iraq, said Rep. Rahm Emanuel, D-Ill., a member of the House Democratic leadership. "I'm not surprised about where people are. They're hearing only about Iraq." Congress' reduced appeal was evident in several categories of people. Only 48 percent of Democrats said they approved of Congress, down from 55 percent last month. That included a 12 percentage point drop among Democratic women, though support from Democratic men remained steady. Approval by minorities also fell a dozen points to 39 percent, with a similar reduction among people whose family incomes exceed $75,000. By region, the steepest drop was in the Midwest, where approval fell by 10 percentage points to 28 percent. Congress' highest approval was in the Northeast, where four in ten gave it a positive rating. As for Pelosi, D-Calif., her overall approval of 45 percent stood 10 points higher than Bush's and Congress'. She was seen favorably by 52 percent of women, but only 39 percent of men. While whites are closely split about her, minorities approve of her job by a 15-point margin. Pelosi's numbers are about where she was last month but slightly lower than in January. In the last month, she has lost significant support from younger voters, college-educated women and Westerners. "Voters are frustrated by the fact that the president refuses to change direction on Iraq," said Pelosi spokesman Brendan Daly. Bush's approval ratings are lowest for his handling of Iraq and domestic issues including health care, with about one-third seeing him favorably. About four in 10 like the job he is doing on the economy and foreign policy. Men give the president higher grades than women do, whites higher than minorities, and married people higher than singles. The AP-Ipsos survey involved telephone interviews with 1,000 adults. It has a margin of sampling error of plus or minus 3 percentage points. killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7439756.html Prosecutors to seek death penalty in wildfire that killed 5 firefighters to seek death penalty in wildfire that killed 5 firefighters Arson suspect Raymond Lee Oyler is seen during a court appearance in this file photo taken Friday, Dec. 15, 2006. 2007 at 7:30 2007 at 7:30 AM PDT RIVERSIDE, Calif. (AP) - A prosecutor said Wednesday he will pursue the death penalty against the man accused of setting a wildfire that killed five firefighters last fall. Riverside County District Attorney Rod Pacheco said he made the decision after reviewing the evidence and consulting with the firefighters' family members, who were split on the capital punishment question. He said several factors, including Raymond Lee Oyler's criminal record and the severe losses suffered by the community, influenced his decision. Oyler, a 36-year-old auto mechanic, is charged with five counts of first-degree murder, 17 counts of using an incendiary device and 23 counts of arson. He was arrested Oct. 31 after the wind-whipped Esperanza fire raced through the foothills near Banning, about 90 miles east of Los Angeles. "I considered what I personally considered to be an incredible and callous disregard to the safety of the firefighters who would respond to the fires over a period of time," Pacheco said. "He expressed on numerous occasions that he wanted to burn the mountain down." Oyler was convicted in 2001 on a drug possession charge and has had run-ins with the law in California and Missouri. Defense attorney Mark McDonald said Oyler expected the decision. "That said, Mr. Oyler has always been and still remains confident that the issue of death will never come before a jury anyway," McDonald said. "He's confident he won't be convicted of the Esperanza Fire and the related fires." During a hearing two months ago, Oyler's fiancee and second cousin testified that he had boasted about lighting fires in the Banning Pass area during the summer months. Crystal Breazile, however, denied that her fiance set the blaze that claimed the U.S. Forest Service firefighters' lives. Breazile, who has a young daughter with Oyler, said she and Oyler were watching televised reports of another arson wildfire in late May when the auto mechanic told her he had started the blaze. She testified that she threatened to leave him if he didn't stop setting fires. Oyler's second cousin also testified that Oyler told her he spent the night of Oct. 21 casing a mountain in the Banning area for a good spot to set a fire and said he set "some small fires" there the next day, cousin Jill Frame testified. Prosecutors allege Oyler set the fires in the Banning Pass area using devices made of wooden stick matches and Marlboro cigarettes. Investigators have said that they were able to match Oyler's DNA with samples from cigarette butts used to start fires on June 9 and June 10, but not to the device used to start the Esperanza blaze. Firefighters Jason McKay, 27; Jess McLean, 27; Daniel Hoover-Najera, 20; Mark Loutzenhiser, 43, and Pablo Cerda, 23, were overrun by flames Oct. 26 while protecting a home. Some 10,000 people attended their memorial service. killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7460417.html Parents drop Katrina as baby name because of hurricane drop Katrina as baby name because of hurricane AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - As baby names go, Katrina isn't in vogue these days. But she isn't persona non grata, either. From its peak in the 1980s - when it regularly ranked among the 100 most popular names that parents chose for their daughters - it had gradually slumped to 247th by 2005, even before Hurricane Katrina smashed the Gulf Coast in late summer of that year. The name's association with the catastrophe has now knocked it out of consideration for most parents, sinking its popularity to the lowest ebb since the 1950s. Only about 850 baby girls in the United States were named Katrina last year, according to new data released Friday by the Social Security Administration, dropping it more than 100 slots on the popularity list. At a rank of 382nd, it now sits just below Brenna. Ironically, the two states that suffered most of Katrina's wrath bucked the trend, if only in small numbers. In Louisiana, the number of babies named Katrina jumped from eight in the 12 months before the storm to 15 in the 12 months after, according to state health officials. In Mississippi, seven babies were given the name from 2004 until the storm hit in August 2005, according to state data. The number climbed to 24 from September 2005 through the end of 2006. The national trend surprised Cleveland Evans, a psychology professor and names expert at Bellevue University in Nebraska. Usually, he said, publicity around a name - positive or negative - will cause it to spike. After Hurricane Camille devastated the Gulf Coast in 1969, for example, the name Camille quickly became more popular, he said. "So many parents are looking for a new, unusual name, there are always a few of them who are going to take it from any cultural event," said Evans, the past president of the American Name Society. "There must be some sort of (negative) threshold and Katrina must have crossed it." Still, he said Katrina isn't likely to go extinct. "This is not going to be a name like Adolf that's going to disappear and be unusable ever again," he said, referring to that name's association with Adolf Hitler. "Even though it will be associated with this disaster I think there are enough other associations that it will continue to be a popular name." That was the case with Scarlett and Stephen Billis, a Los Angeles-area couple who named their daughter Katrina last May. Scarlett Billis said they were reluctant to use the name less than a year after the hurricane, but her husband had always liked it as a variation of Katherine, a family name. Also, their family is Greek and the name is close to the popular Greek name Katerina. "People ask if we named her after the hurricane," Billis said. "We didn't pick it because of that and we were actually hesitant ... but we do joke that our house looks like a hurricane hit." Overall, the country's most popular names list hasn't changed much since 2005. Emily and Jacob remain atop the list. Emily has been the top girls' name since 1996; Jacob for boys since 1999. Sophia cracked the top 10 list for the first time, and William returned after dropping off in 2005. Coming in last in the agency's rankings, which only go up to 1,000, were Jarvis and Flor. The rankings, which the Social Security Administration releases each year just before Mother's Day, which is Sunday, are based on some 4.2 million Social Security card applications from 2006. The agency counts all spelling variations differently, so some names with alternate spellings - like Ashley and Ashlee - are more popular than the rankings indicate. Generally, Evans said, naming customs in the U.S. have grown increasingly decentralized, with far more variety in the past. That explains how traditional names like John and Mary have been replaced by upstarts like Ethan and Emma on the most popular list. "There are so many young parents who don't want to give their children one of the most popular names," he said. "It's much more spread out now, and one reason is that this information is now so readily available. "I know a lot of people of my generation who named their children Ashley or Jessica and who said they would have never named their children that if they had known they were so popular. Well today, you don't really have that excuse." Social Security began compiling the name lists in 1997. The agency offers lists of baby names for each year since 1880 on its Web site: http://www.socialsecurity.gov killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7459792.html Wildfire threatens Calif. resort city threatens Calif. resort city A fire fighting helicopter passes over the raging wildfire as it approached the town of Avalon on Catalina Island, Calif. (AP Photo/Kevork Djansezian) AM PDT By ANDREW GLAZER Associated Press Writer AVALON, Calif. (AP) - Firefighters struggled early Friday to prevent a wildfire from reaching homes on the edge of Santa Catalina Island's main city as residents and visitors fled the resort isle off the Southern California coast. At least 160 firefighters, aided by four water-dropping helicopters and three retardant-dropping air tankers, battled flames through most of Thursday. The helicopters flew into the night and were expected to be back in the air at dawn Friday. Dozens of fire engines from as far away as Fresno arrived through the night aboard giant military hovercraft from the Marine Corps' Camp Pendleton. The high-speed hovercraft can carry 60 tons over land or water and are often used by the military on humanitarian missions. The blaze broke out Thursday afternoon on the island more than 20 miles off the coast. Flames threatened the city limits of Avalon, where hundreds of people lined up at the harbor Thursday night to board ferries back to the mainland. Many covered their faces with towels and bandanas as ashes fell. A few homes burned but firefighters were protecting other properties late into the night, Avalon Fire Chief Steven Hoefs said. About 1,200 homes were under voluntary or mandatory evacuation orders. ''We're hanging in for now,'' Hoefs said. The blaze that began five miles east of the island's airport grew to 4,000 acres, feeding on dry brush as winds steadily blew throughout the day and into the night. Winds later calmed and the air grew moist, although the threat remained. An orange inferno loomed behind the quaint crescent harbor, landmark 1929 Catalina Casino and homes, restaurants and tiny hotels clinging to slopes above the waterfront. A commercial building and several warehouse structures burned, and 175 utility customers lost electricity when power poles caught on fire. Overnight, Blackhawk and Chinook helicopters were ferrying in firefighters - 32 at a time. Hand crews were being positioned at the city's edge to protect homes. ''We're on defense mode for now,'' Hoefs said. In Avalon, authorities used a bullhorn to urge people to evacuate and head to the beach. Visitors were directed to the historic art deco Casino until it lost power, while residents were sent to another harbor site. The Catalina Express ferry service added several night departures of 400-passenger vessels from Avalon. Hundreds of residents and visitors boarded the ferries to reach the mainland. A family of eight said they had just enough time to pack some clothes and personal papers before fleeing. ''I'm scared,'' said Angelica Romero, 30, holding her 7-month-old daughter. ''But what's important is I have my children. The rest doesn't matter.'' At the mainland port of Long Beach, island resident Kathy Troeger arrived on a ferry with her three children and a friend's daughter. Her husband, a captain in county fire's Baywatch division, stayed behind to help fight the fire. ''It was like a nightmare when we left,'' she said. ''You couldn't breathe and ash was falling like snow.'' An evacuation center was set up at Cabrillo High School, where about 85 people had checked in, according to the Red Cross. Despite being well offshore, Catalina has been left parched by the lack of rainfall that has made the rest of Southern California particularly susceptible to wildfires like the one in Los Angeles' Griffith Park this week. Firefighters were still working Friday to surround what remained of the fire, which briefly chased people from homes and threatened the park's landmark observatory and zoo. Officials had expected the blaze to be fully contained by Thursday, two days after it peaked, but fire crews were still building containment lines around the fire's perimeter late into the night, though no visible flames remained. Only 2 inches of rain have fallen on Catalina since January. A long, narrow island, Catalina covers 76 square miles and is served by helicopters and ferry boats from Los Angeles, Long Beach and other mainland harbors. Avalon has a population of 3,200 that swells to more than 10,000 on weekends and in summer, according to the Catalina Island Chamber of Commerce and Visitors Bureau. Most the island is owned by the Santa Catalina Island Conservancy and is home to a various wildlife. Associated Press writers Daisy Nguyen and Christina Almeida in Los Angeles and Gillian Flaccus in Long Beach contributed to this report. killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national Authorities investigate possible terror threat on U.S. interests in Germany Authorities had no indication of an imminent attack within Germany or the U.S., said FBI special agent Richard Kolko. "We remind the public to remain vigilant and report any suspicious activity to the appropriate law enforcement authorities," he said. 2 killed when small airplanes collide over Cincinnati suburb Two small aircraft collided Friday over suburban Cincinnati, raining debris onto roads and backyards and killing two people on board, authorities said. Blue Angels regroup for N.C. show, first since fatal crash For Blue Angels pilots, whose demeanor is a key part of the job, the tragedy offers another opportunity to perform the mission they were first given six decades ago: promote the U.S. Navy and U.S. Marines Corps to the world. Hundreds flee wildfire on resort island off California coast Parents drop Katrina as baby name because of hurricane Poll: Public gives both Congress, Bush low approval ratings Koreas adopt agreement enabling historic train crossing of their border Runaway trailer starts deadly crash on Chesapeake Bay bridge House rejects 9-month withdrawal for troops, agrees to guarantee funds only through July Prime Minister Tony Blair says he will resign in June Wildfire threatens Calif. resort city Prosecutors to seek death penalty in wildfire that killed 5 firefighters French president-elect defends luxury yacht trip Wildfires, floods, tropical weather make life miserable across nation Moderates in Congress labor to break Iraq funding impasse British police make 4 arrests related to 2005 suicide bombings in London clerk's tip was key to foiling Fort Dix terror plot forecast 2007 hurricane season to be more active than usual FBI: Mobsters competed for credit for hit on social club bandits Gunmen seize 4 U.S. workers in Nigeria amid escalating violence in oil region Tennessee executes inmate convicted of killing police officer Cheney makes unannounced visit to Iraq Six killed when train slams into SUV Archaeologists find tomb of King Herod Navy helicopter crash kills 5 on training flight at base in Nevada Queen Elizabeth concludes 6-day visit to U.S. killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7460302.html Runaway trailer starts deadly crash on Chesapeake Bay bridge trailer starts deadly crash on Chesapeake Bay bridge AM PDT ANNAPOLIS, Md. (AP) - A runaway trailer started a chain-reaction crash on the Chesapeake Bay bridge, killing three people and injuring five others as dozens of vehicles swerved to avoid it, authorities said. As crumpled trucks were hauled away Thursday evening, structural engineers examined the bridge by boat, air and foot and it was found to be structurally sound and safe, said Marcus Brown, chief of the Maryland Transportation Authority Police. Friday morning, all lanes were open again. The bridge, officially known as the William Preston Lane Jr. Memorial Bridge, is the main artery connecting Maryland's Eastern Shore with the rest of the state. With the westbound lanes closed all night, stores on the eastern side were busy. "They can't get across the bridge to go home so they're just hanging out until the bridge opens up. It's good for business, but it's not good for me here all alone," said Melodie Shreve, who was working by herself at the Shore Stop in Stevensville. The Best Western in Grasonville, a few miles from the bridge, sold out by 8 p.m. Melissa Hess, the front desk supervisor, said some guests who had suites even gave up their second room to help stranded motorists. The crash started when a small flatbed trailer being pulled by an SUV came unattached shortly after 4 p.m. at the start of the bridge's westbound span. In all, seven vehicles crashed, including a tanker hauling animal fat and a tow truck. "Other vehicles that were following swerved to avoid a trailer and that's what started this collision," said police Cpl. Jonathan Green. He described it as an "unbelievable crash scene" with vehicles pinned against each other and the railings, but said none went off the bridge. Brown said it was too early in the investigation to say whether charges would be filed. One person was flown to the University of Maryland Shock Trauma Center with life-threatening injuries; four others had less serious injuries, Brown said. killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7439811.html Prime Minister Tony Blair says he will resign in June Minister Tony Blair says he will resign in June 2007 at 7:34 2007 at 7:34 AM PDT TRIMDON, England (AP) - Tony Blair said Thursday he would step down as prime minister on June 27, closing a decade of power in which he fostered peace in Northern Ireland and followed the United States to a war in Iraq that cost him much of his popularity. In a somber farewell, Blair made way for Treasury chief Gordon Brown to take the top post. The British leader looked overcome with emotion, struggling to retain his trademark broad grin as loud cheers rang out. Following the Sept. 11, 2001, terrorist attacks in the United States, it was right, Blair said, to "stand shoulder to shoulder with our oldest ally, and I did so out of belief." "Hand on heart, I did what I thought was right," Blair told party workers and supporters at Trimdon Labour Club in his Sedgefield constituency in northern England. "I may have been wrong, but that's your call. But believe one thing if nothing else. I did what I thought was right for our country." Brown, Blair's dour partner in reforming the Labour Party and a sometimes impatient rival in government, was expected to easily win election as the party's new leader and become the next prime minister. Brown has never criticized Blair's decision to go to war in Iraq and has given no indication on how he will steer Britain's role in the conflict. Blair, 54, has stopped just short of openly endorsing Brown, a stern Scot who lacks his charisma and common touch. The two men stuck together during the 2005 election campaign, at one point famously facing the cameras and eating ice cream. The camaraderie sometimes seemed forced, though they rarely disagreed in public on the issues. On one occasion as he sat beside Blair during that campaign, Brown was asked whether he would have done the same as the prime minister over Iraq. There was a long pause before Brown said: "Yes." The government has declared its hopes of withdrawing from front-line operations this year - a move certain to please a public anxious to see an end to the conflict. In London, Laura Phillips, 21, a banker, reflected the anti-war mood. "I'll fight for him if he gets our troops out of Iraq," she said. Blair embraced dozens of local Labour activists as he arrived to greet around 250 supporters packed into the former mining village's Labour clubhouse. Some chanted "four more years," but were chided by the leader as he began his speech. "That's not on message for today," Blair joked. For his long-expected announcement, Blair returned to the district where he won election to Parliament in 1983, and where he announced in 1994 that he was a candidate for Labour Party leader. Blair's announcement came days after he celebrated the 10th anniversary of Labour's landslide election victory of May 1, 1997. Since then, he has been one of the most praised, and reviled, leaders in British history - the man who transformed the Labour Party, helped end Northern Ireland's troubles but angered many of his supporters by committing Britain to a bloody, unpopular war in Iraq. When he was elected at 43 in 1997, Blair was the youngest prime minister of the 20th century - the first born after World War II and the only one to have played in a college rock band, Ugly Rumours. He transformed Labour from an old-style social-democratic party to centrist "New Labour" and led it to three consecutive election victories. Under the stewardship of Blair and Brown, the British economy has thrived. London rivals New York as the world's pre-eminent financial center, GDP is up, unemployment is down and interest rates are low, though rising. However, Blair's promised health and education reforms remain incomplete, and soaring house prices and increasing personal debt threaten to widen the divide between haves and have-nots. Nonetheless, his supporters say Blair will be remembered for helping the poor. "It's a nostalgic day but we're here to celebrate of all of Tony Blair's achievements, he's done so much to help the people of this country, and so much to lift people out of poverty," said Maureen Lenehan, an official at the Trimdon Labour Club. Blair announced his departure date two days after the formation of Northern Ireland's full power-sharing administration, a goal he spent much of his premiership striving to achieve. But despite his accomplishments, Blair's legacy looks to be dominated by Iraq. His decision to stand should-to-shoulder with President Bush by committing troops for the invasion divided his party and the country. Blair said he was content for history to judge him, but four years on and with almost 150 British troops dead in Iraq, the war is more unpopular than ever. His last months in office also have been overshadowed by a police investigation into claims that his party and the opposition traded political honors for cash. Senior Blair aide Ruth Turner, Blair's chief fundraiser Lord Levy and two others have been arrested during the police inquiry into claims that seats in the House of Lords and other honors were awarded in exchange for party donations. Prosecutors are considering whether anyone should be charged. Blair was questioned twice by police as a witness, but is not considered a suspect. In recent months, Blair's thoughts have turned to the lessons of his decade in power. "When I first started in politics, I wanted to please everyone," Blair said during a tour of the Middle East in December. "After a time I learned that you can't please everyone, and you learn that the best thing is to do what you think is right and everyone can make their judgment." killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7460322.html Koreas adopt agreement enabling historic train crossing of their border adopt agreement enabling historic train crossing of their border South Korean tourists watch a train running on the rail, which two Koreas hope to reconnect as part of an agreement reached at a summit in 2000. AM PDT SEOUL, South Korea (AP) - North and South Korea adopted a military agreement Friday enabling the first train crossing of their heavily armed border in more than half a century, the South's Defense Ministry said. The rail test, planned for Thursday, would be the first time trains have crossed the tightly sealed border since inter-Korean rail links were severed in the middle of the 1950-53 Korean War. Two tracks have been reconnected as part of a series of reconciliation projects launched since the two sides held the first-ever summit of their leaders in 2000. The test would be just a single run of trains along the restored tracks on each side of the peninsula, with regular train service between the two sides unlikely to begin anytime soon. The two Koreas had agreed in principle on security for the rail test earlier this week, but the adoption of a formal agreement came only after more than 30 hours of extended talks that stretched into Friday due to unspecified sticking points. South Korea hopes the inter-Korean railways could ultimately be linked to Russia's Trans-Siberian railroad, and could allow an overland route connecting the peninsula to Europe - significantly cutting delivery times for freight that now requires sea transport. Economic officials from both sides agreed last month to conduct the train run, but North Korea's military had the final say on whether it goes forward because such a border crossing requires security arrangements. The security accord sets out protocols for the train crossings next week, including what areas of the border should open and for how long, as well as pledges from each side to guarantee travelers' safety. South Korea had hoped to expand the agreement to cover similar future border crossings, but the North refused. The two sides also agreed in principle to set up a joint fishing area around their disputed western sea border and continue talks on that issue and other measures aimed at preventing accidental clashes in the area, according to a joint statement summarizing the negotiations' outcome. North Korea doesn't recognize the current sea border demarcated by the United Nations at the end of the 1950-53 Korean War, and has long claimed it should be further south. The waters around the border are rich fishing grounds and boats from the two Koreas routinely jostle for position during the May-June crab-catching season. In 1999 and 2002, their navies fought deadly skirmishes, killing several sailors and sinking six ships. The two sides agreed to hold the next general-level talks in July and continue discussions to set up a defense ministers' meeting, the joint statement said. This week's talks were the first high-level military contacts between the two sides in a year. The two Koreas remain technically at war because the Korean War ended in a cease-fire that has never been replaced with a peace treaty. Ties between the two sides have warmed significantly since the 2000 summit, although they suffered during the international standoff over North Korea's nuclear ambitions. Pyongyang conducted its first-ever nuclear test in October, chilling relations with the South. But the South began reaching out again to the North after Pyongyang agreed in February to shut down its nuclear reactor under an agreement with the United States and four other neighboring countries. Still, the communist regime missed an April deadline to close the reactor because of a separate financial dispute with the United States, and it is unclear when it will close down the facility. killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7439546.html French president-elect defends luxury yacht trip president-elect defends luxury yacht trip The Paloma yacht carrying French President-elect Nicolas Sarkozy, visible at left, enters Valetta Grand Harbour, in Malta. 2007 at 7:21 2007 at 7:21 AM PDT PARIS (AP) - President-elect Nicolas Sarkozy refused to apologize Wednesday for taking a luxury yacht trip criticized by his political opponents as indecent, saying he had the right to rest a week before taking office. A day after his election Sunday, Sarkozy whisked his wife and son off for a tour around Malta while violence erupted in several cities around France. Bands - thought to be mainly but not exclusively leftist militants - torched more than 1,200 cars in three days, and vandals broke windows at the local headquarters of Sarkozy's Union for a Popular Movement party in southeastern Villeurbanne. Interior Minister Francois Baroin said at least 80 people were detained Tuesday night and that the unrest was ebbing. Even before his expected return Wednesday evening, the conservative Sarkozy defended his mini-vacation aboard nearly 200-foot yacht on loan from billionaire investor Vincent Bollore. "I have no intention of apologizing," he said by telephone to Europe-1 radio, adding that he had a full week before taking on "the supreme responsibilities of president of the republic in as calm a mood as possible. "I'm taking two and a half days. I don't think anyone can argue with that." Outgoing President Jacques Chirac, who held his final Cabinet meeting Wednesday, will turn over power to Sarkozy on May 16 after 12 years in office. Former Socialist Justice Minister Elisabeth Guigou called Sarkozy's escapade "scandalous" and "indecent." "All this money when he pretends to be the ... president of all the French," she said on the TV station iTele. Such an "ostentatious" display was "shocking to the great masses of French who have a hard time making ends meet." Sarkozy defeated Socialist candidate Segolene Royal, winning a mandate to rejuvenate a sluggish economy and bring France firmly into the era of globalization with a dose of market-liberating policies. Later this week, Sarkozy will meet with British Prime Minister Tony Blair in Paris, Sarkozy's press office said, without giving a date. The two are believed to have close relations but differing opinions on the future of the European Union. Paparazzi have captured images of Sarkozy, 52, on the yacht and jogging on an island off Malta. Government spokesman Jean-Francois Cope asked the left-wing opposition to end "personal attacks" on Sarkozy, who has been criticized as too fond of money and glitz. The state, he added in an interview on France-2 television, was not paying for the mini-vacation. Sarkozy, former interior minister and friend of France's top industrialists, served for years as mayor of Neuilly, a wealthy Paris suburb. Sarkozy defended his billionaire friend Bollore on Europe-1. "It is not shameful to have worked hard, to have created a big (investment) group, to have given people jobs," he said. Former Prime Minister Jean-Pierre Raffarin also defended Sarkozy's retreat, saying the president-elect needed to "recharge his batteries" after a grueling campaign. "Nicolas Sarkozy has the right to three days of happiness with his family," Raffarin said on RTL radio. "It's from May 16 that the French will judge the new president." The leftist opposition, along with unions, fear Sarkozy will dismantle workers' benefits and favor the rich over the poor. "We were warned. Mr. Sarkozy never said he would be the president of the ... poor," Sen. Jean-Luc Melenchon was quoted as saying in the daily Liberation. "He is the president of the CAC40," the French stock market. The leader of the Workers' Force union warned that Sarkozy would have a tough time pushing through a key proposal to guarantee minimum service during public transport strikes. Sarkozy's victory does not give him "a blank check to apply each of his promises," Jean-Clause Mailly told the business daily Les Echos. "We have already let Nicolas Sarkozy know that there is no question of us negotiating" an accord on minimum service, he said. "Minimum service in public transport puts into question the right to strike." killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7469057.html Authorities investigate possible terror threat on U.S. interests in Germany investigate possible terror threat on U.S. interests in Germany PM PM PDT By KATHERINE SHRADER Associated Press Writer WASHINGTON (AP) - U.S. and German agencies are investigating a potential plot against U.S. military bases, buildings and citizens in Germany, officials said Friday. Authorities had no indication of an imminent attack within Germany or the U.S., said FBI special agent Richard Kolko. "We remind the public to remain vigilant and report any suspicious activity to the appropriate law enforcement authorities," he said. The possible plot was first made public on April 20 when the U.S. Embassy in Berlin issued a warning, telling U.S. diplomatic and consular facilities in Germany to increase security and asking Americans there to increase their vigilance. Security outside U.S. bases in Germany was also increased. ism official, who spoke on condition of anonymity, said the concern - then and now - is that U.S. military bases, American tourists and other U.S. interests in Germany could be attacked. The official said information gathered on the suggested that the plot could involve bombs or small arms. The information was not specific about the potential attack's time or location, the official added. The official said counter ism authorities believed Islamic extremists were behind the planning, but the official had no reason to suspect al-Qaida specifically. Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for the White House's National Security Council, said, "The United States is working with German authorities, as we do with our allies around the world, to counter any potential The Homeland Security Department sought to make clear there was no known plot inside U.S. borders. "There is no credible intelligence to suggest an imminent to the homeland at this time," said spokesman Russ Knocke. In Germany, the Interior Ministry said prosecutors had opened an investigation. Daniel Mattern, a spokesman for the U.S. Embassy in Berlin, said there had been no changes since it issued its April 20 warning for U.S. diplomatic and consular facilities. Associated Press writers David Rising in Berlin and Terence Hunt, Lara Jakes Jordan and Beverley Lumpkin in Washington contributed to this report. (Copyright 2007 by The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.) killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7468662.html 2 killed when small airplanes collide over Cincinnati suburb killed when small airplanes collide over Cincinnati suburb PM PM PDT SHARONVILLE, Ohio (AP) - Two small aircraft collided Friday over suburban Cincinnati, raining debris onto roads and backyards and killing two people on board, authorities said. The accident evidently involved two planes, the Federal Aviation Administration said in a recorded message. The agency initially said one of the aircraft might have been a helicopter. Witnesses gave conflicting accounts of the types of aircraft involved. The FAA had no information about the aircrafts' flight plans or why they were so close together. Blue Ash Airport, a runway used by small planes, is several miles away. No injuries were reported on the ground. Several roads were closed because of the debris. The planes' pilots were not required to file flight plans and apparently were not in contact with air traffic controllers, the FAA said. Resident Joe Muenks said wreckage from one of the planes fell in a yard about three blocks from his house. "It took out about a third of a tree," Muenks said. "The plane nose-dived ... The metal was so crunched together we could just see there was no way anyone who was in there could have survived." What remained of the other plane landed in a street less than a mile away, blocking the two-lane road with some debris ending up in a front yard. The aircraft narrowly missed a busy interstate, coming down on either side of it. killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7465547.html Blue Angels regroup for N.C. show, first since fatal crash Angels regroup for N.C. show, first since fatal crash The Blue Angels practice maneuvers at Seymour Johnson Air Force Base in Goldsboro, N.C., Thursday, May 10, 2007. PM PM PDT SEYMOUR JOHNSON AIR FORCE BASE, N.C. (AP) - After 21 years as a U.S. Navy pilot, his career boasting nearly 900 aircraft carrier landings and air combat during the first Gulf War, tragedy comes as no surprise to Cmdr. Kevin Mannix. That includes last month's fatal crash of a fellow Blue Angels pilot during a show in South Carolina. But for Blue Angels pilots, whose demeanor is a key part of the job, the tragedy offers another opportunity to perform the mission they were first given six decades ago: promote the U.S. Navy and U.S. Marines Corps to the world. "Our ability to bounce back and do our mission is the same as every other squadron in the U.S. Navy or U.S. Marine Corps," said Mannix, minutes after practicing Thursday at Seymour Johnson Air Force Base in Goldsboro, where the team on Saturday will perform its first show since the crash April 21. "The only difference is there's a lot more visibility on us because we are in the public eye. That's our job and that's what we do. I think a lot more media was focused our way on this specific mishap." Lt. Cmdr. Kevin Davis, 32, died when his No. 6 jet went down during the final minutes of a performance at the Marine Corps Air Station Beaufort in Beaufort, S.C. The Pittsfield, Mass., native was in his first year flying in formation with the team. An investigation into the cause of the crash, the Blue Angels' first since 1999 and the 26th fatality in the team's 60-year history, could take several months, according to the Navy. The Blue Angels typically fly their F/A-18A Hornets six days a week, but they stayed on the ground for nine days after the crash, canceling performances May 5 and May 6 at Offutt Air Force Base in Nebraska. Saturday's show will feature only five jets. Lt. Cmdr. Craig Olson, 37, of Kirkland, Wash., replaced Davis a couple of weeks ago. Olson, who flew with the Blue Angels from 2003-2005, will practice with the team for a few more weeks before flying in a show, Mannix said. Mannix said there was a lot of anxiety among the pilots before they flew for the first time after the crash. "We lost a brother, a great friend, a great American, actually," Lt. Cmdr. John Allison, who flies the No. 5 jet, told reporters Thursday after practice. "But we're trying to move forward and think about flying, you know, think about our jobs." During Thursday's practice, the team flew in its traditional delta formation, the triangle lineup they were in when Davis crashed. Olson practiced as one of two solo members, hitting mach speeds and performing head-on near misses with Allison. Each year, the Navy considers up to about 70 pilots for the squadron. The final six pilots train constantly between January and March at El Centro Naval Air Facility, Calif., and are stationed at Pensacola Naval Air Station in Florida. The team is scheduled to fly 66 air shows this year at 35 locations across the country, including Seattle. The Blue Angels fly without the traditional G-suits, which most jet pilots wear to avoid blacking out during maneuvers that exert strong gravitational forces. The suits inflate and deflate air bladders around the lower body to keep blood in the brain and heart. The air bladders can cause a pilot to bump the control stick, so the Blue Angels learn to manage the G-forces by tensing their abdominal muscles. After a fatal crash, one of the best responses is to get back into the cockpit, team members said, and grace the skies with twirls, climbs, dives and near misses at around 350 mph and only inches apart. "It feels good for the team to go back and do it," Mannix said Thursday, "including myself all the way down to the maintainers to do what we do for the American public, to get out there and show them we are resilient in what we do." killed investigate dead fawn dressed like baby
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7468662.html FAA: 3 dead in collision between airplanes over Cincinnati suburb 3 dead in collision between airplanes over Cincinnati suburb PM PM PDT SHARONVILLE, Ohio (AP) - Two small planes collided Friday afternoon over suburban Cincinnati, raining debris onto roads and backyards and killing three people on board but missing those on the ground as rush hour approached, federal investigators said. The two aircraft narrowly missed falling on a busy freeway. "I'm just thankful it wasn't worse than it was, with school buses and people coming home from work and the interstate that we have nearby," said Michael Schappa, Sharonville's police chief. The Federal Aviation Administration had no information about the planes' flight plans or why they were so close together. Blue Ash Airport, a runway used by small planes, is several miles away. State Highway Patrol Lt. Wayne Price said investigators assume both planes took off from there. The planes' pilots were not required to file flight plans and apparently were not in contact with air traffic controllers, the FAA said. Under federal regulations, the pilots were responsible for maintaining a safe distance on a clear, sunny afternoon. Two of the victims were aboard a Cessna 172, and their identities were withheld pending notification of relatives. The pilot of the other plane, a Beechcraft Bonanza, was identified as Neils Harpsoe of suburban West Chester. No injuries were reported on the ground. Several roads and highways were temporarily closed because of the debris. A piece of a wreckage rested against a guardrail on a heavily traveled highway, where a police car with lights flashing blocked the debris for investigators as vehicles drove past. Resident Joe Muenks said wreckage from one of the planes fell in a yard about three blocks from his house. "It took out about a third of a tree," Muenks said. "The plane nose-dived ... The metal was so crunched together we could just see there was no way anyone who was in there could have survived." His son, Kevin, was playing basketball in the backyard and heard the collision. "I just heard a big pop and I looked up," Kevin Muenks said. "The plane was just coming straight down, just nose-dived into the ground. There was no explosion, fire or anything." What remained of the other plane landed in a street a few miles away, blocking the two-lane road with some debris ending up in a front yard. Based on witness accounts, the FAA initially said one of the single-engine aircraft might have been a helicopter. The agency later confirmed two planes were involved. killed phone bill, text message ban signed into law turn out to greet local 'Idol' finalist
http://www.komotv.com/news/national Va. Tech grads remember victims of shooting rampage Struggling to balance grief with a graduation celebration, Virginia Tech President Charles Steger handed out class rings Friday night to the families of students slain during last month's shooting rampage. Authorities investigate possible terror threat on U.S. interests in Germany Authorities had no indication of an imminent attack within Germany or the U.S., said FBI special agent Richard Kolko. "We remind the public to remain vigilant and report any suspicious activity to the appropriate law enforcement authorities," he said. FAA: 3 dead in collision between airplanes over Cincinnati suburb Two small planes collided Friday afternoon over suburban Cincinnati, raining debris onto roads and backyards and killing three people on board but missing those on the ground as rush hour approached, federal investigators said. Blue Angels regroup for N.C. show, first since fatal crash Hundreds flee wildfire on resort island off California coast Parents drop Katrina as baby name because of hurricane Poll: Public gives both Congress, Bush low approval ratings Koreas adopt agreement enabling historic train crossing of their border Runaway trailer starts deadly crash on Chesapeake Bay bridge House rejects 9-month withdrawal for troops, agrees to guarantee funds only through July Prime Minister Tony Blair says he will resign in June Wildfire threatens Calif. resort city Prosecutors to seek death penalty in wildfire that killed 5 firefighters French president-elect defends luxury yacht trip Wildfires, floods, tropical weather make life miserable across nation Moderates in Congress labor to break Iraq funding impasse British police make 4 arrests related to 2005 suicide bombings in London clerk's tip was key to foiling Fort Dix terror plot forecast 2007 hurricane season to be more active than usual FBI: Mobsters competed for credit for hit on social club bandits Gunmen seize 4 U.S. workers in Nigeria amid escalating violence in oil region Tennessee executes inmate convicted of killing police officer Cheney makes unannounced visit to Iraq Six killed when train slams into SUV Archaeologists find tomb of King Herod Navy helicopter crash kills 5 on training flight at base in Nevada killed phone bill, text message ban signed into law turn out to greet local 'Idol' finalist
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7473362.html Va. Tech grads remember victims of shooting rampage Tech grads remember victims of shooting rampage PM PM PDT BLACKSBURG, Va. (AP) - Struggling to balance grief with a graduation celebration, Virginia Tech President Charles Steger handed out class rings Friday night to the families of students slain during last month's shooting rampage. As images of the slain students and faculty flashed on a huge screen at Lane Stadium, Steger and Provost Mark McNamee handed out the rings and got hugs from the victims' relatives. "Please know that moving on - moving on is not the same as forgetting," Steger said. "We shall not forget. Yet, one senseless burst of violence - as horrible and hurtful as it is - will not turn us from our essence." The university planned to hand out diplomas to the slain students Saturday during ceremonies for individual colleges. "Short was their stay on this mortal stage. Great was their impact," Steger said of the slain students in an address earlier Friday to about 600 of the nearly 1,200 graduate students who received master's degrees and doctorates. Gunman Seung-Hui Cho killed the 27 fellow students, five faculty members and himself. His family will receive neither a ring nor a diploma, the university said. In many ways, the evening ceremony for some 3,600 undergraduates seemed like most commencements. Grinning students jumped up and down and waved as their faces appeared on the stadium's giant screen while "Pomp and Circumstance" played and a faint drizzle fell. Students chanted "Let's go, Hokies!" and the stadium's stands twinkled with constant camera flashes from the graduates' proud family members. Students decorated their mortarboards with "VT" and "Hi Mom." But the speeches, while marked by hope, were also laced with sorrow. "Rest assured, we will define ourselves by where we have been and where we will go," class historian Jennifer Weber said. Survivors have a responsibility to realize the dreams and aspirations of the slain, said the keynote speaker, retired Army Gen. John Abizaid, the former commander of U.S. forces in Iraq. "While we are saddened by the loss of those who cannot be here today, I believe that they would want this ceremony to commemorate both the tragedy of yesterday and the promise of tomorrow," he said. "I believe that they look down on this gathering with dignified pride." Students, parents and faculty rose to their feet and cheered as Abizaid thanked Steger for "holding things together" in a time of tragedy. During the graduate ceremonies, nine slain graduate students were awarded posthumous master's degrees or doctorates. Faculty members hugged the relatives who received them, some wiping away tears and all drawing long and loud applause from the crowd of several thousand. James Long, whose sister, Michelle, earned a degree in history, said students would not let the tragedy overshadow their celebration. "There are too many people here to celebrate five, six years of hard work to let one guy screw that up," said Long, 25, of Richmond. Some families couldn't bear to attend graduation. Others said they had no choice but to come. "We have to. This is right for us," said Peter Read, whose freshman daughter Mary Karen Read was among those killed. Peter and Cathy Read returned to campus for more than their daughter's degree. They also returned to erase an unsettling image from the minds of their two youngest sons, Patrick, 4, and Brendan, 2. "They're a little concerned that the bad man's going to shoot them," Cathy Read said. "We can't let that idea grow in their heads." In Washington, President Bush issued a statement praising "the compassion and resilient spirit" of the Virginia Tech community and the 3,600 graduating seniors and others earning advanced or associate degrees. "Laura and I salute the Virginia Tech Class of 2007. We also remember the students and teachers whose lives were taken last month," he said. "They will always hold a special place in the hearts of this graduating class and an entire nation." Twins Andrea and Michelle Falletti of Chantilly, Va., said the shootings will not be what they remember when they look back on four years of college. Rather, they will recall spring breaks, camping trips and partying with friends. "Obviously, what has happened has affected everything in our lives, and it will affect graduation," said Andrea Falletti, 21. "In a way, it's not going to be celebrating us as much; it's more about what we've done as a community. But that's OK. I'm proud of what we've done here." killed phone bill, text message ban signed into law turn out to greet local 'Idol' finalist
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7512367.html Outgoing deputy knew best about prosecutor firings, Gonzales says deputy knew best about prosecutor firings, Gonzales says Deputy Attorney General Paul McNulty testifies on Capitol Hill in Washington in this Tuesday, Aug. 1, 2006 file photo. 2007 at 8:06 2007 at 8:06 AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - Attorney General Alberto Gonzales said Tuesday he relied on his resigning deputy more than any other aide to decide which U.S. attorneys should be fired last year. His comments come a less than a day after Deputy Attorney General Paul McNulty announced he would resign at the end of the summer - a decision that people familiar with the plans said was hastened by the controversy over the purge of eight prosecutors. "You have to remember, at the end of the day, the recommendations reflected the views of the deputy attorney general. He signed off on the names," Gonzales told reporters at a National Press Club forum in Washington. "And he would know better than anyone else, anyone in this room, anyone - again, the deputy attorney general would know best about the qualifications and the experiences of the United States attorneys community, and he signed off on the names." Gonzales also called McNulty's pending departure "a loss. ... I'm really going to miss him." But he said he relied on McNulty's views more than another other adviser, and said he was reassured by his deputy as recently as March that the firings all were justified. "The one person I would care about would be the views of the deputy attorney general, because the deputy attorney general is the direct supervisor of the United States attorneys," Gonzales said. The attorney general, who has long been a confidant and associate of George W. Bush, has apparently surmounted a wave of calls last month for his resignation in the wake of the flap over the firings of the federal prosecutors. Republicans taking part in a House Judiciary Committee hearing last week defended him, saying that Democrats should back away in their continuing investigation of the firings. That contrasted sharply with calls from some Senate Republicans for Gonzales' resignation earlier this year. President Bush has steadfastly supported Gonzales, saying the firings were appropriate but conceding that Gonzales and the Justice Department did a poor job of communicating to Congress how the changes in the federal prosecutor offices were handled. higher gas prices forced you to change your driving habits? Yes, I drive less Yes, I take the bus or train Yes, I now drive a more fuel-efficient car No, I still buy the same amount of gas Child run over in driveway dies at hospital Motorcyclist killed in high-speed crash Man beats 91-year-old WWII vet, passersby turn a blind eye The Schrammie: Sucking profit from the ground 'I didn't know it was going to kill him' Man dies after being shocked with Taser during struggle with officers Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Family has questions after man is found dead Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Cell phone bill, text message ban signed into law
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7512282.html Washington and Moscow agree to tone down rhetoric and Moscow agree to tone down rhetoric Russian President Vladimir Putin chairs a Cabinet meeting in the Kremlin in Moscow, Monday, May 14, 2007. 2007 at 7:58 2007 at 7:58 AM PDT MOSCOW (AP) - Russia and the United States have agreed to moderate their rhetoric in a bid to improve strained ties, Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice said Tuesday after Rice met with President Vladimir Putin. Rice said recent comments by Putin and other Russians had not been "helpful" to relations and had obscured positive developments and cooperation on a wide range of issues. "We did talk about the need to keep the temperature down," she said after seeing Putin in an effort to calm rising tensions between the former Cold War enemies. She described some remarks as "overheated rhetoric," while accepting a Russian explanation that Putin's recent reference in a speech to Nazi Germany, widely perceived as criticism of the United States, was not intended to slight the Bush administration. "I have said while I am here that the rhetoric is not helpful," Rice told reporters. "It is disturbing to Americans who are trying to do our best to maintain an even relationship." "We are going to have our differences, there is no doubt about that. There are going to be old scars to overcome, there is no doubt about that ... But the relationship needs to be free of exaggerated rhetoric," she said. Speaking separately, Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov said that Putin agreed. "The president supported the American side's understanding that it's necessary to tone down the rhetoric in public statements and concentrate on concrete business," Lavrov, who participated in the meeting, told reporters. Lavrov also suggested Rice had not dispelled Russia's opposition to U.S. plans to station a defense missile system in Europe, saying that "our stance on missile defense was reaffirmed." Rice said missile defense continued to be an area that the two countries needed "to work through" but that no country, including Russia, would have a "veto" on issues related to U.S. national security. In another key area, Lavrov said that the two countries agreed to search for a mutually acceptable solution on Kosovo, but failed to achieve a breakthrough. "It was agreed to search for a solution on Kosovo that would be acceptable for all, but there is no such solution immediately in sight," he said after taking part in the meeting at Putin's residence outside Moscow. There has been growing transoceanic tension about the U.S. missile defense plan, concern in Washington about Moscow's treatment of its neighbors and steps Putin has taken to consolidate power in the Kremlin - seen as democratic backsliding - as Russia prepares for presidential and parliamentary elections next year. Rice headed into the talks in Moscow acknowledging that ties were tense, but rejecting suggestions that a "new Cold War" had erupted. "I don't throw around terms like 'new Cold War,"' Rice said. "It is a big, complicated relationship, but it is not one that is anything like the implacable hostility" between the United States and the Soviet Union for a half-century after World War II. "It is not an easy time in the relationship," Rice added, "but it is also not, I think, a time in which cataclysmic things are affecting the relationship or catastrophic things are happening in the relationship." She noted that the United States and Russia are working together in numerous areas: on Iran and North Korea's nuclear programs, the global spread of weapons of mass destruction and efforts to achieve Middle East peace. Despite the agreement to cool down the rhetoric, a planned event at which Rice and Putin were to be photographed together and make brief remarks was canceled by the Kremlin and a senior Russian diplomat on Monday warned the U.S. not to try to go it alone in world affairs. In April, simmering Russian anger over U.S. plans to place missile defense components in Poland and the Czech Republic, both former Warsaw Pact members, boiled over despite Washington's pledges to cooperate with Moscow on the system. Russia views the plan as an attempt to alter the strategic balance. Rice has dismissed such concerns as "ludicrous," but top Russian military officials have hinted the system might be targeted. Last month, hours before the United States and its NATO allies met in Norway to discuss the matter, Putin threatened to suspend Russia's participation in a key treaty limiting military deployments in Europe. Rice says that NATO and the United States want to keep the Conventional Forces in Europe pact alive but cannot unless Russia abides with its treaty commitments. Russia views U.S. activity in its former sphere of influence with growing suspicion. Just last week, Putin denounced "disrespect for human life, claims to global exclusiveness and dictate, just as it was in the time of the Third Reich." higher gas prices forced you to change your driving habits? Yes, I drive less Yes, I take the bus or train Yes, I now drive a more fuel-efficient car No, I still buy the same amount of gas Child run over in driveway dies at hospital Motorcyclist killed in high-speed crash Man beats 91-year-old WWII vet, passersby turn a blind eye The Schrammie: Sucking profit from the ground 'I didn't know it was going to kill him' Man dies after being shocked with Taser during struggle with officers Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Family has questions after man is found dead Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Cell phone bill, text message ban signed into law
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7512337.html Toddler feared dead after flash flood sweeps away stroller feared dead after flash flood sweeps away stroller Fire rescue divers watch the rushing water as they keep a look out for a boy who was swept away when his mother fell near a tributary of the South Platte River. 2007 at 8:03 2007 at 12:33 PM PDT DENVER (AP) - Severe thunderstorms sent normally placid streams over their banks across the Denver area, sweeping away a 2-year-old boy in a stroller and a teenager who was trying to help with a rescue. Both were still missing Tuesday, police said. The toddler's mother had been out for a stroll Monday along a bike path that follows a creek near downtown. It had been a sunny morning, and the thunderstorm developed quickly. In less than an hour, it dumped more than an inch of rain, flooding streets and sending a torrent of water down the tiny creek. The woman sought refuge under a bridge as hail started to fall but realized she needed to leave the path, Denver Fire Department spokesman Phil Champagne said. "Once you enter (the bike path), you're in a chute," Champagne said. "She knew she was in trouble and was trying to get out. She was on the phone with her grandfather, trying to figure out a way out. "The water knocked her down, she was dragged for a little bit and was unable to hold onto the stroller," Champagne said. "What a tragic event. That poor mother to see her child swept away like that." Firefighters struggled against the current to rescue the woman, but her son and stroller were swept downstream. The stroller was later found empty more than a mile away in the South Platte River, Champagne said. Firefighters sent two divers to reach the mother as she clung to a concrete embankment. When she realized firefighters did not her son, she apparently released her grip and drifted downstream, where other firefighters pulled her from the water, Champagne said. In south Denver, a police officer and firefighters were able to save one teenager from a swollen creek in a park, but another teen who apparently was trying to help was swept away and remained missing, Champagne said. Rescuers searched Tuesday for the 2-year-old, believing he could have become stuck in the eddies of the South Platte River. A search for the teen was expected later. The officer was hospitalized with what appeared to be hypothermia, police spokesman John White said. The missing baby's mother was also hospitalized. Their names were not released. higher gas prices forced you to change your driving habits? Yes, I drive less Yes, I take the bus or train Yes, I now drive a more fuel-efficient car No, I still buy the same amount of gas Child run over in driveway dies at hospital Motorcyclist killed in high-speed crash Man beats 91-year-old WWII vet, passersby turn a blind eye The Schrammie: Sucking profit from the ground 'I didn't know it was going to kill him' Man dies after being shocked with Taser during struggle with officers Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Family has questions after man is found dead Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Cell phone bill, text message ban signed into law
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7504307.html Al-Qaida group warns U.S. forces to halt search for missing soldiers group warns U.S. forces to halt search for missing soldiers Iraqi soldiers take a defensive position while on the joint search mission with U.S. troops near Youssifiyah, 20 kilometers (12 miles) south of Baghdad, Iraq, Saturday, May 12, 2007. (AP Photo/Haidar Fatehi) 2007 at 5:57 PM 2007 at 5:58 PM PDT By KIM GAMEL Associated Press Writer BAGHDAD (AP) - An al-Qaida front group warned the United States on Monday to halt its expanding search for three "if you want their safety." The Pentagon acknowledged for the first time it believes the servicemen are in terrorist hands. The statements came as thousands of U.S. and Iraqi troops swept through farmhouses, fields and palm groves south of Baghdad in hopes of finding the - last seen before a pre-dawn attack Saturday in an area considered a stronghold of Sunni extremists. Four Americans and one Iraqi soldier were killed in the ambush. For a third day, jets, helicopters and unmanned surveillance aircraft crisscrossed the skies over the sparsely populated farm area near Mahmoudiya, 20 miles south of Baghdad. U.S. and Iraqi troops - backed by dog teams - searched vehicles and pedestrians. Other teams peered into crawl spaces and probed for possible secret chambers in homes. Residents complained of random detentions and homes being ransacked as the hunt drew in more troops and brought taunting messages from the presumed captors. In a Web posting, the Islamic State of Iraq, an insurgent alliance that includes al-Qaida, demanded that the Americans stop the search because it will "lead to nothing but exhaustion." are in our hands. If you want their safety, do not search for them," the statement said. It also suggested that the weekend ambush was in revenge for the rape-murder of 14-year-old Abeer Qassim al-Janabi by American in the area last year. Five have been charged in the case, and three have pleaded guilty. "You should remember what you have done to our sister Abeer in the same very area," the statement said. "In the war against you, sometimes we win, sometimes we lose." The message went on mock the "invincible" image of the U.S. soldier. In a statement Monday, chief U.S. military spokesman Maj. Gen. William Caldwell said the U.S. was using "every asset and resource available" to find the "At this time, we believe they were abducted by terrorists belonging to al-Qaida or an affiliated group, and this assessment is based on highly credible intelligence information," he said. were taken alive, it would be the biggest single abduction of U.S. in Iraq since March 23, 2003, when Pvt. Jessica Lynch and six others were captured in an ambush near Nasiriyah in which 11 Americans were killed. At Fort Riley, Kan., the former U.S. military commander in Iraq said could face higher chances of ambush and capture under a new strategy to shift troops into smaller outposts - part of plans to seek more outreach with Iraqi civilians and possible tips on militant activities. "But the strategy has exposed them to greater risk of attack," said Gen. George Casey after meeting with Fort Riley and 1st Infantry Division commanders. The redeployment of troops into the smaller bases has been strongly supported by Casey's successor, Gen. David Petraeus. Al-Qaida has been active for years in the string of towns and villages south of the capital - a region known as the "triangle of death" after frequent attacks on U.S. and Iraqi forces as well as Shiite civilians traveling to shrine cities in the south. Last June, al-Qaida claimed responsibility for the deaths of two U.S. whose mutilated bodies were later found in the same area where the weekend ambush occurred. Later, al-Qaida statements also linked those killings to the rape-murder of the 14-year-old Sunni girl. In another Web statement, a rival coalition of Sunni insurgent groups - the Jihad and Reform Front - accused al-Qaida of killing 12 of its senior members in Baghdad's Dora neighborhood about 15 miles north of the search area. The coalition claimed to represent the Islamic Army of Iraq, the 1920 Revolution Brigade and the Mujahedeen Army and apparently signaled new rifts within insurgent ranks in Iraq. During the search Monday, U.S. and Iraqi forces exchanged fire with gunmen near the town of Youssifiyah, killing two and injuring four, an Iraqi army officer said. The officer, who spoke on condition of anonymity because he was not supposed to release information, said about 100 suspects had been detained. The U.S. military would not comment. In a statement Monday, the U.S. command said the attack on Saturday occurred at 4:44 a.m., but a rescue force took an hour to reach the site because the area was rigged with bombs. The military said the quick reaction force found three roadside bombs hidden near the site and feared insurgents were preparing an ambush. "You can't just rush into an area ... or your first responders could become casualties as well," said spokesman Lt. Col. Christopher Garver. "You don't know if somebody is waiting there with a rocket-propelled grenade and if they shoot a helicopter down then it becomes a much bigger problem." Garver said about 4,000 U.S. troops were participating in the search operation. One of the four dead Americans was identified Monday by his family. He was Army Sgt. 1st Class James David Connell Jr., 40, of Lake City, Tenn. The area around Mahmoudiya has been especially volatile because Saddam Hussein recruited members of Sunni tribes there into his elite Republican Guard and intelligence services. Many of them were believed to have joined the insurgency after Saddam's regime collapsed in the 2003 U.S.-led invasion. U.S. officers also say extremists have fled Baghdad for surrounding areas to escape the three-month Baghdad security crackdown. Elsewhere, five other U.S. troops were killed in separate attacks Monday in Baghdad and surrounding areas south of the capital. A sixth soldier died Monday of non-combat related causes, the U.S. military said. That raised number of American service members to have died this month to 47. In southern Iraq, a roadside bomb in Basra killed one Danish soldier and wounded five other Danes and their Iraqi translator, the Danish military said. have been killed in Iraq since the war began. In February, the Danish government said it would withdraw its 460-member contingent from Basra by August and replace it with a smaller helicopter unit. In other violence, at least 52 Iraqis were killed or found dead after a series of bombings, shootings and mortar attacks, all but 11 in Baghdad. (Copyright 2007 by The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.) higher gas prices forced you to change your driving habits? Yes, I drive less Yes, I take the bus or train Yes, I now drive a more fuel-efficient car No, I still buy the same amount of gas Child run over in driveway dies at hospital Motorcyclist killed in high-speed crash Man beats 91-year-old WWII vet, passersby turn a blind eye The Schrammie: Sucking profit from the ground 'I didn't know it was going to kill him' Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Man dies after being shocked with Taser during struggle with officers Family has questions after man is found dead Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Cell phone bill, text message ban signed into law
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7504867.html Bush directs agencies to devise new air pollution regulations directs agencies to devise new air pollution regulations 2007 at 6:46 PM 2007 at 6:46 PM PDT By JENNIFER LOVEN Associated Press Writer WASHINGTON (AP) - President Bush, prodded by a Supreme Court ruling, said Monday his administration will decide how to regulate pollution from new motor vehicles by the time he leaves office. Bush signed an executive order directing federal agencies to craft regulations that will "cut oline consumption and greenhouse emissions from motor vehicles." He ordered the agencies - the departments of Transportation, Agriculture and Energy and the Environmental Protection Agency - to have the rules in place by the end of 2008. The announcement came as hit a new record. The average national price of a gallon of reached $3.07 on Monday, above the previous peak of $3.06 set soon after Hurricane Katrina hit at the end of August 2005. "When it comes to energy and the environment, the American people expect common sense and they expect action," the president said in a Rose Garden appearance before reporters. "We're taking action by taking the first steps toward rules that will make our economy stronger, our environment cleaner and our nation more secure for generations to come." What those rules would look like was anything but clear. White House press secretary Tony Snow said the president's position opposing mandatory emissions caps has not changed. While recognizing that greenhouse es are a serious contributor to climate change, Bush has said that anything other than a voluntary approach would unduly harm the nation's economy. "The question is: do you try to set up a mandatory system or do you try to set up an innovation-based system?" Snow said. "The president prefers innovation." But the Democratic-controlled Congress is considering a number of bills that would impose a cap on emissions of carbon dioxide, the leading linked to global warming, and a carbon trade system. "It appears that the president wants to run out the clock to the end of his term without addressing our energy needs," said House Speaker Nancy Pelosi, D-Calif. Last month, the Supreme Court declared that carbon dioxide and other greenhouse es qualify as air pollutants under the Clean Air Act and thus can be regulated by the EPA. The court also said that the "laundry list" of reasons the administration has given for declining to do so are insufficient, ruling that the EPA must regulate carbon dioxide if it finds that it endangers public health. EPA administrator Stephen Johnson said a draft proposal should be ready by fall, and that it will include a finding on whether carbon dioxide is a health threat. He suggested there could be no regulation if no threat is found, or if the agency determines there is "some other reason and rational explanation for why it was not necessary to regulate." Bush said that, in writing any rules, agency officials must take into account the views of the general public, scientific knowledge, available technology, the cost and the impact the new rules would have on safety. All this left environmentalists and Democrats on Capitol Hill concerned. A report this month from a United Nations network of over 2,000 scientists estimates the world must stabilize the amount of greenhouse es in the atmosphere within eight years to keep global temperatures from spiking to disastrous levels. The environmental group Environmental Defense said the effort "will fall far short of fixing the climate problem" without mandatory caps on carbon emissions. "Whether EPA will lead the fight against global warming or lead us to a hotter planet remains to be seen," said Environmental Defense President Fred Krupp. Bush and administration officials said the process will take time because it is so complicated. Johnson indicated that - at the least - the new rules could implement the president's plan for reducing consumption by 20 percent over 10 years. As announced in Bush's State of the Union address in January, this plan envisions increasing the country's use of alternative fuels to 35 billion gallons by 2017. It also would give the administration the ability to rewrite mileage rules for passenger cars, which now must meet a two-decades-old fleet average of 27.5 mpg, so that they are based on a vehicle's size. Bush says this is a safe way to boost car mileage, but critics say it could spur the production of more guzzlers. It is less ambitious than a bill approved earlier this month in a Senate committee, which would raise the nationwide fleet fuel economy to an average of 35 mpg by 2020, and others being drafted in the House. Johnson said that since the Supreme Court decision gave the EPA "significant latitude" as to how to comply with its regulatory obligations, the administration interprets that as the authority to implement Bush's proposal without congressional approval. However, he stressed that legislation to Bush's liking is preferable. (Copyright 2007 by The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.) higher gas prices forced you to change your driving habits? Yes, I drive less Yes, I take the bus or train Yes, I now drive a more fuel-efficient car No, I still buy the same amount of gas Child run over in driveway dies at hospital Motorcyclist killed in high-speed crash Man beats 91-year-old WWII vet, passersby turn a blind eye The Schrammie: Sucking profit from the ground 'I didn't know it was going to kill him' Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Man dies after being shocked with Taser during struggle with officers Family has questions after man is found dead Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Cell phone bill, text message ban signed into law
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7514137.html Jerry Falwell dies at 73 Falwell dies at 73 The Rev. Jerry Falwell speaks at a rally on the steps of the Alabama Capitol in Montgomery. Ala. in this Saturday, Aug. 16, 2003 file photo. 2007 at 9:58 2007 at 12:02 PM PDT LYNCHBURG, Va. (AP) - The Rev. Jerry Falwell, the television evangelist who founded the Moral Majority and used it to mold the religious right into a political force, died Tuesday shortly after being found unconscious in his office at Liberty University. He was 73. Ron Godwin, the university's executive vice president, said Falwell was found unresponsive late Tuesday morning and taken to Lynchburg General Hospital, where he was pronounced dead about an hour later. "I had breakfast with him, and he was fine at breakfast," Godwin said. "He went to his office, I went to mine, and they found him unresponsive." Dr. Carl Moore, Falwell's physician, said the evangelist had a heart rhythm abnormality. He said Falwell was found without a pulse and never regained consciousness. Falwell had made careful preparations for a transition of his leadership to his two sons, Jerry Falwell, Jr., now vice-chancellor of Liberty University, and Jonathan Falwell, executive the pastor of Thomas Road Baptist Church. One daughter, Jeannie Falwell Savas, Surgeon, Richmond, Va. Godwin said. "He has left instructions for those of us who had to carry on, and we will be faithful to that charge," Godwin said. Falwell had survived two serious health scares in early 2005. He was hospitalized for two weeks with what was described as a viral infection, then was hospitalized again a few weeks later after going into respiratory arrest. Later that year, doctors found a 70 percent blockage in an artery, which they opened with stents. "Jerry has been a tower of strength on many of the moral issues which have confronted our nation," fellow evangelist Pat Robertson said Tuesday. Falwell credited his Moral Majority with getting millions of conservative voters registered, electing Ronald Reagan and giving Republicans Senate control in 1980. "I shudder to think where the country would be right now if the religious right had not evolved," Falwell said when he stepped down as Moral Majority president in 1987. The fundamentalist church that Falwell started in an abandoned bottling plant in 1956 grew into a religious empire that included the 22,000-member Thomas Road Baptist Church, the "Old Time Gospel Hour" carried on television stations around the country and 7,700-student Liberty University, which began as Lynchburg Baptist College in 1971. He built Christian elementary schools, homes for unwed mothers and a home for alcoholics. Liberty University's commencement is scheduled for Saturday, with former U.S. House Speaker Newt Gingrich as the featured speaker. Sen. John McCain, the school commencement speaker last year, said Tuesday that his prayers were with Falwell's family. "Dr. Falwell was a man of distinguished accomplishment who devoted his life to serving his faith and country," McCain said. Last year, Falwell marked the 50th anniversary of his church and spoke out on stem cell research, saying he sympathized with people with medical problems, but that any medical research must pass a three-part test: "Is it ethically correct? Is it biblically correct? Is it morally correct?" Falwell had once opposed mixing preaching with politics, but he changed his view and in 1979, founded the Moral Majority. The political lobbying organization grew to 6.5 million members and raised $69 million as it supported conservative politicians and campaigned against abortion, homosexuality, pornography and bans on school prayer. Falwell became the face of the religious right, appearing on national magazine covers and on television talk shows. In 1983, U.S. News & World Report named him one of 25 most influential people in America. In 1984, he sued Hustler magazine for $45 million, charging that he was libeled by an ad parody depicting him as an incestuous drunkard. A federal jury found the fake ad did not libel him, but awarded him $200,000 for emotional distress. That verdict was overturned, however, in a landmark 1988 U.S. Supreme Court decision that held that even pornographic spoofs about a public figure enjoy First Amendment protection. The case was depicted in the 1996 movie "The People v. Larry Flynt." With Falwell's high profile came frequent criticism, even from fellow ministers. The Rev. Billy Graham once rebuked him for political sermonizing on "non-moral issues." Falwell quit the Moral Majority in 1987, saying he was tired of being "a lightning rod" and wanted to devote his time to his ministry and Liberty University. But he remained outspoken and continued to draw criticism for his remarks. Days after Sept. 11, 2001, Falwell essentially blamed feminists, gays, lesbians and liberal groups for bringing on the terrorist attacks. He later apologized. In 1999, he told an evangelical conference that the Antichrist was a male Jew who was probably already alive. Falwell later apologized for the remark but not for holding the belief. A month later, his National Liberty Journal warned parents that Tinky Winky, a purple, purse-toting character on television's "Teletubbies" show, was a gay role model and morally damaging to children. Falwell was re-energized after family values proved important in the 2004 presidential election. He formed the Faith and Values Coalition as the "21st Century resurrection of the Moral Majority," to seek anti-abortion judges, a constitutional amendment banning same-sex marriage and more conservative elected officials. The big, blue-eyed preacher with a booming voice started his independent Baptist church with 35 members. From his living room, he began broadcasting his message of salvation and raising the donations that helped his ministry grow. "He was one of the first to come up with ways to use television to expand his ministry," said Robert Alley, a retired University of Richmond religion professor who studied and criticized Falwell's career. In 1987, Falwell took over the PTL (Praise the Lord) ministry in South Carolina after Jim Bakker's troubles. Falwell slid fully clothed down a theme park water slide after donors met his fund-raising goal to help rescue the rival ministry. He gave it up seven months later after learning the depth of PTL's financial problems. Largely because of the Bakker and Jimmy Swaggart scandals, donations to Falwell's ministry dropped from $135 million in 1986 to less than $100 million the following year. Hundreds of workers were laid off and viewers of his television show dwindled. Liberty University was $73 million in debt and on the verge of bankruptcy, and his "Old Time Gospel Hour" was $16 million in debt. By the mid-1990s, two local businessmen with long ties to Falwell began overseeing the finances and helped get companies to forgive debts or write them off as losses. Falwell devoted much of his time keeping his university afloat. He dreamed that Liberty would grow to 50,000 students and be to fundamentalist Christians what Notre Dame is to Roman Catholics and Brigham Young University is to Mormons. He was an avid sports fan who arrived at Liberty basketball games to the cheers of students. Falwell's father and his grandfather were militant atheists, he wrote in his autobiography. He said his father made a fortune off his businesses - including bootlegging during Prohibition. As a student, Falwell was a star athlete and a prankster who was barred from giving his high school valedictorian's speech after he was caught using counterfeit lunch tickets his senior year. He ran with a gang of juvenile delinquents before becoming a born-again Christian at age 19. He turned down an offer to play professional baseball and transferred from Lynchburg College to Baptist Bible College in Springfield, Mo. "My heart was burning to serve Christ," he once said in an interview. "I knew nothing would ever be the same again." The day before he died, Falwell had been up on the Liberty campus hillside chatting with students, Godwin said. He was talking about plans for the future that day and over breakfast Tuesday morning, he said. "Dr. Falwell was a giant of faith and a visionary leader," Godwin said. He "has always been a man of great optimism and great faith." Falwell is survived by his wife, Macel, and three children, Jerry, Jonathan and Jeannie. higher gas prices forced you to change your driving habits? Yes, I drive less Yes, I take the bus or train Yes, I now drive a more fuel-efficient car No, I still buy the same amount of gas Child run over in driveway dies at hospital Motorcyclist killed in high-speed crash Man beats 91-year-old WWII vet, passersby turn a blind eye The Schrammie: Sucking profit from the ground 'I didn't know it was going to kill him' Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Man dies after being shocked with Taser during struggle with officers Family has questions after man is found dead Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Cell phone bill, text message ban signed into law
http://www.komotv.com/news/national 18-year-old in New York shoots himself without a gun Damion M. Mosher, who put bullets in a vise and whacked them with a hammer to empty the brass shell casings, was hit in the abdomen by one of the shots, authorities said. Jerry Falwell dies at 73 The Rev. Jerry Falwell, who founded the Moral Majority and built the religious right into a political force, died Tuesday shortly after being found unconscious in his office at Liberty University, a school executive said. Outgoing deputy knew best about prosecutor firings, Gonzales says Attorney General Alberto Gonzales said Tuesday he relied on his resigning deputy more than any other aide to decide which U.S. attorneys should be fired last year. Toddler feared dead after flash flood sweeps away stroller White House says Wolfowitz should not be ousted despite breaking rules Washington and Moscow agree to tone down rhetoric U.S. troops question hundreds in search for missing soldiers Bush directs agencies to devise new air pollution regulations Gunman kills two bank tellers and wounds two others during robbery Al-Qaida group warns U.S. forces to halt search for missing soldiers 8 states seek sex offender data from MySpace Rice to meet with Putin amid strains, says there's no 'new Cold War' Massive wildfire bedevils residents along Florida-Georgia line U.S.-Iraqi forces battle insurgents in search for 3 missing American soldiers Parents outraged after teachers stage fake gunman attack on sixth-graders Wedding insurance covers calamities - and cold feet Ford, Acura vehicles earn top crash test scores Recovery program for North America's fastest mammal working wonders Iran confirms arrest of Iranian-American academic; hardline newspaper accuses her of spying Top Taliban commander killed in Afghanistan Happy Mother's Day - love, your gangster son Bird migration patterns shifting - an early warning of climate change Al-Qaida claims to be holding missing U.S. troops Cat survives 35-day trip inside cargo crate Police: S.C. man held his family in squalor Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Marine lawyer: Civilian deaths during combat don't need to be investigated Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Have higher gas prices forced you to change your driving habits? Yes, I drive less Yes, I take the bus or train Yes, I now drive a more fuel-efficient car No, I still buy the same amount of gas Child run over in driveway dies at hospital Motorcyclist killed in high-speed crash Man beats 91-year-old WWII vet, passersby turn a blind eye The Schrammie: Sucking profit from the ground 'I didn't know it was going to kill him' Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Man dies after being shocked with Taser during struggle with officers Family has questions after man is found dead Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Cell phone bill, text message ban signed into law
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7512327.html White House says Wolfowitz should not be ousted despite breaking rules House says Wolfowitz should not be ousted despite breaking rules 2007 at 8:01 2007 at 10:07 AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - The White House defended embattled World Bank President Paul Wolfowitz on Tuesday, saying findings that he broke bank rules in arranging a hefty pay package for his girlfriend did not amount to "a firing offense." Wolfowitz, who maintain that he acted in good faith, is waging a vigorous fight to keep running the institution. He will try to defend himself before the bank's 24-member board late Tuesday. The board, whose proceedings are carried out behind closed doors, ultimately will decide what actions to take against him. Board members have discussed a range of disciplinary options. It could fire Wolfowitz, ask him to resign, signal that it lacks confidence in his leadership or reprimand him. Board members have been leaning toward an expression of no confidence or other tough language that would make it difficult - if not impossible - for Wolfowitz to stay on. At the White House, spokesman Tony Snow said he did not think Wolfowitz has done anything to warrant his resignation. Snow said that President Bush continues to support Wolfowitz, who had served as the No. 2 official at the Pentagon and was an architect of the U.S.-led war in Iraq before took over the bank nearly two years ago. "What we've said is, yeah, he's made mistakes," Snow said. "That pretty much is obvious. On the other hand, it's not a firing offense." Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson also does not think the facts merit dismissal, according to department spokeswoman Brookly McLaughlin. The controversy that has put Wolfowitz's job in jeopardy involves his handling of the 2005 compensation package for his girlfriend, Shaha Riza, a bank employee. A special bank panel, in a report released late Monday, concluded that Wolfowitz broke bank rules in his handling of the pay package. It said the board must consider whether Wolfowitz "will be able to provide the leadership" to ensure that the bank achieves its mission of fighting poverty around the world. In a response, Wolfowitz said, "It is highly unfair and unwarranted to now find that I engaged in a conflict of interest because I relied on the advice of the ethics committee as best I understood it." The special panel acknowledged that the informal advice provided by the bank's ethics committee "was not a model of clarity." But it also said that Wolfowitz's involvement in the details of Riza's salary "went beyond the informal advice" given by the ethics committee and that he "engaged in a de facto conflict of interest." Under Wolfowitz' contract as well as the code of conduct for board officials, he was required to avoid any conflict of interest, the report said. Riza worked for the bank before Wolfowitz took over as president in June 2005. She was moved to the State Department to avoid a conflict of interest, but stayed on the bank's payroll. Her salary went from close to $133,000 to $180,000. With subsequent raises, it eventually rose to $193,590. European members are pushing for Wolfowitz to resign. The Bush administration says Wolfowitz should stay. The United States is the bank's largest shareholder. Bush tapped Wolfowitz for the job, a move that was approved by the bank's board. "A clear reading of the facts in this report demonstrates that this was a unique situation, missteps occurred on all sides and communication may not have been clear enough," said Treasury's McLaughlin. "The facts reveal that President Wolfowitz acted to find a pragmatic solution and to carry out the direction he received from the ethics committee," she added. higher gas prices forced you to change your driving habits? Yes, I drive less Yes, I take the bus or train Yes, I now drive a more fuel-efficient car No, I still buy the same amount of gas Child run over in driveway dies at hospital Motorcyclist killed in high-speed crash Man beats 91-year-old WWII vet, passersby turn a blind eye The Schrammie: Sucking profit from the ground 'I didn't know it was going to kill him' Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Man dies after being shocked with Taser during struggle with officers Family has questions after man is found dead Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Cell phone bill, text message ban signed into law
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7514927.html 18-year-old in New York shoots himself without a gun in New York shoots himself without a gun 2007 at 10:47 2007 at 10:47 AM PDT LAKE LUZERNE, N.Y. (AP) - A young man shot himself without using a gun. Damion M. Mosher, who put bullets in a vise and whacked them with a hammer to empty the brass shell casings, was hit in the abdomen by one of the shots, authorities said. Warren County deputies said they were called to Mosher's home in Lake Luzerne on Saturday afternoon after one bullet went about a half-inch into his abdomen. He was treated at Glens Falls Hospital and was released. No charges were filed. Mosher, 18, told authorities he was trying to empty the .223-caliber rounds to collect the brass casings for scrap. Sheriff Larry Cleveland said about 100 other rounds that Mosher hit had "fizzled," but one was somehow sent with more force. It was unclear if the bullet ricocheted or hit him directly. An employee of an Albany scrap metal company told The Post-Star of Glens Falls that the business pays $1.70 a pound for scrap brass shell casings. Cleveland said Mosher's shells amounted to just a few pounds. Lake Luzerne, at the southeastern edge of the Adirondacks, is 45 miles north of Albany. higher gas prices forced you to change your driving habits? Yes, I drive less Yes, I take the bus or train Yes, I now drive a more fuel-efficient car No, I still buy the same amount of gas Child run over in driveway dies at hospital Motorcyclist killed in high-speed crash Man beats 91-year-old WWII vet, passersby turn a blind eye The Schrammie: Sucking profit from the ground 'I didn't know it was going to kill him' Man dies after being shocked with Taser during struggle with officers Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Seattle cruise ship evacuated after hitting rock Family has questions after man is found dead
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7512267.html U.S. troops question hundreds in search for missing soldiers troops question hundreds in search for missing soldiers Suspected insurgents are held by Iraqi security forces in Baqouba, 35 miles northeast of Baghdad, on Tuesday, May 15, 2007. 2007 at 7:55 2007 at 7:55 AM PDT BAGHDAD (AP) - U.S. troops have questioned hundreds of people and detained 11 in the search for three American soldiers feared captured by al-Qaida during a weekend ambush south of Baghdad, the military said Tuesday. For a fourth day, jets, helicopters and unmanned surveillance aircraft crisscrossed the skies over the sparsely populated farm area near Mahmoudiya, 20 miles south of Baghdad to search for the missing soldiers. U.S. and Iraqi troops - backed by dog teams - searched vehicles and pedestrians. Other teams peered into crawl spaces and probed for possible secret chambers in homes. "We have conducted more than 450 tactical interviews and detained 11 individuals" as of Monday night, U.S. military spokesman Lt. Col. Christopher Garver said. Garver said the Americans were also turning to the local population, which he said "continues to be helpful in providing tips." Elsewhere, two bombs hidden in plastic bags exploded in shops in central Baghdad, killing at least seven people and wounding 17, and dozens of suspected insurgents attacked a village north of the capital, killing five civilians and wounding 14, Iraqi authorities said. On Monday, the Islamic State of Iraq - an al-Qaida front group that claims it has the soldiers - warned the U.S. to halt its search by about 4,000 troops, and the Pentagon acknowledged for the first time that it believes the soldiers are in terrorist hands. Last June, al-Qaida claimed responsibility for the deaths of two U.S. soldiers whose mutilated bodies were later found in the same area. If all three soldiers now missing are taken hostage alive, it would be the biggest single abduction of U.S. soldiers in Iraq since March 23, 2003, when Pvt. Jessica Lynch and six others were captured in an ambush near Nasiriyah in which 11 Americans were killed. The three were last seen before a pre-dawn ambush Saturday that destroyed several Humvees in a U.S. convoy and killed four Americans and an Iraqi soldier traveling with them. At 9:15 a.m. Tuesday a bomb hidden in a minibus leaving a bus stop on a main road in Mahmoudiya exploded, wounding three Iraqi passengers, police said. Al-Qaida has been active for years in the string of towns and villages south of the capital, a mostly Sunni region known as the "triangle of death" because of frequent attacks on U.S. and Iraqi forces as well as Shiite civilians traveling to shrine cities in the south. During the search Monday, U.S. and Iraqi forces exchanged fire with gunmen near the town of Youssifiyah, killing two and injuring four, an Iraqi army officer said. On Tuesday, an Iraqi interpreter working with the U.S. soldiers said the coalition's search was focusing on rural areas outside Mahmoudiya and that life was proceeding as normal in the city. But he also said Iraqi civilians being stopped for questioning by U.S. forces appeared nervous that they could be attacked by insurgents later, if they were seen cooperating with the coalition. The interpreter spoke on condition of anonymity out of concern for his own security. The area around Mahmoudiya has long been especially volatile because Saddam Hussein recruited members of Sunni tribes there into his elite Republican Guard and intelligence services. Many of them were believed to have joined the insurgency after Saddam's regime collapsed in the 2003 U.S.-led invasion. U.S. officers also say extremists have fled Baghdad for surrounding areas to escape the three-month Baghdad security crackdown. In central Baghdad, a pair of bombs hidden in plastic bags exploded Tuesday afternoon within minutes in two shops selling CDs and cigarettes in Tayaran Square. Police said at least seven people were killed and 17 wounded. The Shiite-controlled commercial area has been struck frequently by suicide attackers and roadside bombs. In Diyala province, about 50 suspected insurgents attacked a small Shiite village early Tuesday, killing five people and wounding 14, Iraqi army and police officers said. Locals fought back for about an hour, and an undetermined number of insurgents were killed or wounded, the officers said. Also Tuesday, a roadside bomb apparently hit a U.S. convoy in the Kamaliya area of southeastern Baghdad. AP Television News video showed one of the convoy's trucks burning and two Black Hawk helicopters circling overhead. Later, when the fire went out, Iraq men and young boys looted what remained of the truck. higher gas prices forced you to change your driving habits? Yes, I drive less Yes, I take the bus or train Yes, I now drive a more fuel-efficient car No, I still buy the same amount of gas Child run over in driveway dies at hospital Motorcyclist killed in high-speed crash Man beats 91-year-old WWII vet, passersby turn a blind eye The Schrammie: Sucking profit from the ground 'I didn't know it was going to kill him' Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Man dies after being shocked with Taser during struggle with officers Family has questions after man is found dead Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Cell phone bill, text message ban signed into law
http://www.komotv.com/news/national/7504802.html Gunman kills two bank tellers and wounds two others during robbery kills two bank tellers and wounds two others during robbery 2007 at 6:37 PM 2007 at 6:38 PM PDT By JAY REEVES Associated Press Writer BESSEMER, Ala. (AP) - A gunman killed two tellers and wounded two others during a Monday morning, then was shot by deputies as he tried to walk out with a hostage, authorities said. Bessemer Police Chief Nathaniel Rutledge said the gunman entered the Wachovia branch shortly after it opened at 9 a.m. and fired on the tellers after demanding money. Investigators believe only a single gunman was involved but are checking whether a second suspect was outside the He declined to elaborate on what happened inside. Video from surveillance cameras is being reviewed, Rutledge said. Police identified the two dead tellers as Sheila Prevo and Eva Hudson. Their ages and hometowns were not given. Prevo had worked at Wachovia for just over two years, and Hudson had been with the company for nearly four years, Mitchell said. employees were taken to a hospital. Police at a news conference said that Anita Gordon was in critical condition and that LaToya Freeman was treated and released. The suspect, whose name was not released, was taken to a hospital. Eight employees were inside the at the time of the shooting, said Wachovia spokeswoman Evelyn Mitchell, but she was unsure whether any customers were present. FBI spokesman Paul Daymond said a deputy was driving by the when he saw a man coming out with a hostage. Deputies said the man was holding a gun to the head of a woman when he tripped, was shot and was captured. Rutledge said a passer-by also tried to intervene when the gunman left the , but he did not elaborate. There was no word on whether any money was taken. Matt Watkins, who was in a nearby pharmacy, said he heard three shots - "pop, then pop-pop" - and looked toward the parking lot, where he saw a man, apparently the wounded suspect, "flopping around." He said he also saw a big man running toward woods. "There were never any security guards," said Watkins, who said he is a customer at the Daymond had no physical description of the second suspect, but surveillance video cameras are visible outside the Yellow crime scene tape was stretched around the one-story on a highway at the edge of downtown Bessemer, a city of 30,000 about 15 miles southwest of Birmingham. officials were working with police and the FBI, Mitchell said. "It's a terrible day for Wachovia," Mitchell told The Birmingham News. "Our hearts are with our employees and their families right now." (Copyright 2007 by The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.) higher gas prices forced you to change your driving habits? Yes, I drive less Yes, I take the bus or train Yes, I now drive a more fuel-efficient car No, I still buy the same amount of gas Child run over in driveway dies at hospital Motorcyclist killed in high-speed crash Man beats 91-year-old WWII vet, passersby turn a blind eye The Schrammie: Sucking profit from the ground 'I didn't know it was going to kill him' Bode Miller's cousin kills officer, then is killed by passer-by Man dies after being shocked with Taser during struggle with officers Family has questions after man is found dead Holocaust survivor found, refuses to meet his son Cell phone bill, text message ban signed into law
